Hawaii, session 2026, SB2379.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Section 201H-191, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended to read as follows: "§201H-191  Dwelling unit revolving fund.  (a) There is created a dwelling unit revolving fund.  The [funds appropriated for the purpose of the dwelling unit revolving fund and all moneys received or collected by the corporation for the purpose of the revolving fund] following shall be deposited [in] into the revolving fund[.]: (1)  Funds appropriated for the purpose of the dwelling unit revolving fund; (2)  A portion of conveyance taxes pursuant to section 247‑7(3); and (3)  All moneys received or collected by the corporation for the purpose of the revolving fund. (b)  The proceeds in the revolving fund shall be used: (1)  To reimburse the general fund to pay the interest on general obligation bonds issued for the purposes of the revolving fund; (2)  For necessary expenses in administering housing development programs, regional state infrastructure programs, and the government employee housing program pursuant to part V; and (3)  To carry out the purposes of housing development programs, regional state infrastructure programs, and the government employee housing program pursuant to part V, including but not limited to the expansion of community facilities and regional state infrastructure constructed in conjunction with housing and mixed-use transit-oriented development projects, permanent primary or secondary financing, and supplementing building costs, federal guarantees required for operational losses, and all things required by any federal agency in the construction and receipt of federal funds or low-income housing tax credits for housing projects. [(b)] (c)  Subject to the requirements of subsection [(a),] (b), proceeds in the revolving fund may be used to: (1)  Establish and operate regional state infrastructure subaccounts pursuant to section 201H-191.5; and (2)  Administer, implement, and finance the government employee housing program pursuant to part V." SECTION 2.  Section 247-7, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended to read as follows: "§247-7  Disposition of taxes.  All taxes collected under this chapter shall be paid into the state treasury to the credit of the general fund of the State, to be used and expended for the purposes for which the general fund was created and exists by law; provided that of the taxes collected each fiscal year: (1)  Ten per cent or $5,100,000, whichever is less, shall be paid into the land conservation fund established pursuant to section 173A-5; [and] (2)  Fifty per cent [or $38,000,000, whichever is less,] shall be paid into the rental housing revolving fund established [by] pursuant to section 201H-202[.]; and (3)  Twenty per cent shall be paid into the dwelling unit revolving fund established pursuant to section 201H‑191." SECTION 3.  Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________